src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2
! or any later version.

! =============== !
! Noun morphology !
! =============== !

! ================================= !
! Distributing the declension types !
! ================================= !

! We first add +N and divide into subgroups

LEXICON tp !aġnaq ere
+N: tp_sing ;
+N: tp_du ;
+N: tp_pl ;

LEXICON tp_gem !geminating stems of 1. declination - amaġuq nusaq/nuyaq
+N: tp_gem_sing ;
+N: tp_gem_du ;
+N: tp_gem_pl ;

LEXICON tpt
+N: tpt_sing ;
+N: tpt_du ;
+N: tp_pl ;

LEXICON tup !aiviq
+N: tup_sg_du_pl ; ! awaiting a split into sg/du/pl lexica

LEXICON tup- !siksrik iñuk
+N: tup-_sg_du_pl ; ! awaiting a split into sg/du/pl lexica


!=======================!
! Simple 1. declination !
!=======================!

LEXICON tp_sing !erre
+Abs+Sg: clit_sing ;
+Rel+Sg:%^TRUNC%>m clit_sing ;
+Abs+Sg+1Sg:%^FRIC%>ga clit_sing ;
+Abs+Sg+2Sg:%^TRUNC%>n clit_sing ;
+Abs+Sg+3Sg:%^TRUNC%>a clit_sing ; !Not verified aġnaq
:%^TRUNC ObliqueCases_Sg ;
+QAQ:%^TRUNC%>qaq IV ;
+IT:%^TRUNC%>it IV ;

! The possessive paradigms are deviant, there are
! just some slotholder forms here. When full paradigms
! are added they should be moved to a separate section.

LEXICON tp_dupl
tp_du ;
tp_pl ;

LEXICON tp_du
+Abs+Du:%^TRUNC%^C%>k clit ; 
:%^C%>k ObliqueCases_Du ; 
+Abs+Du+1Sg:%^TRUNC%>kka clit ;
+Abs+Du+2Sg:%^TRUNC%>kiñ clit ;
+Abs+Du+2Sg+Arch:%^TRUNC%>kkiñ clit ;

LEXICON tp_pl
+Abs+Pl:%^TRUNC%>t clit ;
+Abs+Pl:%^TRUNC%>ch clit ; ! hypercorrect
:%^TRUNC ObliqueCases_Pl ; 
+Abs+Pl+1Sg:%^TRUNC%>tka clit ;
+Abs+Pl+2Sg:%^TRUNC%>tin clit ;
+Abs+Pl+3Sg:%^TRUNC%>ŋi clit ;
+Rel+Pl+3Sg:%^TRUNC%>ŋisa clit ;


!===========================!
! Geminating 1. declination !
!===========================!

LEXICON tp_gem_sing
                       ObliqueCases_Sg ;
+Abs+Sg:               clit ;
+Rel+Sg:%^TRUNC%^C%>m  clit ; ! = kal???
+Abs+Sg+1Sg:%^FRIC%>ga clit ; !just a slotholder
+Abs+Sg+2Sg:%^TRUNC%>n clit ; !just a slotholder
+QAQ:%^TRUNC%>qaq IV ;
+IT:%^TRUNC%>it IV ;

LEXICON tp_gem_du
+Abs+Du:%^TRUNC%^DEFRIC%>k clit ;
:%^C%>k                    ObliqueCases_Du ; 
+Abs+Du+1Sg:%^TRUNC%>kka   clit ; !just a slotholder
+Abs+Du+2Sg:%^TRUNC%>kiñ   clit ; !just a slotholder
+Abs+Du+2Sg+Arch:%^TRUNC%>kkiñ clit ; !just a slotholder

LEXICON tp_gem_pl
+Abs+Pl:%^TRUNC%^C%>t clit ;
:%^TRUNC%^C%>t ObliqueCases_Pl ; 
+Abs+Pl+1Sg:%^TRUNC%>tka clit ; !just a slotholder
+Abs+Pl+2Sg:%^TRUNC%>tin clit ; !just a slotholder



! ======================= !
! 1. declination in schwa !
! ======================= !


LEXICON tpt_sing !aŋun:aŋute
+Abs+Sg:%^CVCTRUNC%>n clit ;
+Rel+Sg:%>m clit ;
+Abs+Sg+1Sg:%^FRIC%>ga clit ; !just a slotholder
+Abs+Sg+2Sg:%^TRUNC%>n clit ; !just a slotholder
:%^CVCTRUNC%>n ObliqueCases_Sg ;
+QAQ:%^TRUNC%>qaq IV ; 
+IT:%>it IV ;  

LEXICON tpt_du
+Abs+Du:%^EBLOCK%>k clit ; 
:%^EBLOCK%>k        ObliqueCases_Du ; 
+Abs+Du+1Sg:%^TRUNC%>kka clit ; !just a slotholder
+Abs+Du+2Sg:%^TRUNC%>kiñ clit ; !just a slotholder
+Abs+Du+2Sg+Arch:%^TRUNC%>kkiñ clit ; !just a slotholder

! Plural forms go to tp_pl, there is no separate tpt_pl lexicon


!=======================!
! Simple 2. declination !
!=======================!

! (assuming tup is 2nd decl)

LEXICON tup_sg_du_pl
+Abs+Sg: clit ;
+Abs+Pl:%>%^FRIC%>it clit ;
ObliqueCases ; ! Not checked for stem adjustment
+QAQ:%^TRUNC%>qaq IV ;
+IT:%^SCHWADEL%>it IV ;

! This paradigm must be completed

LEXICON tup-_sg_du_pl
+Abs+Sg: clit ;
+Abs+Du:%^TRUNC%^C%>k clit ; 
+Abs+Pl:%^TRUNC%>it clit ;
+Abs+Sg+1Sg:%^FRIC%>ga clit ; ! to be moved to Px section
ObliqueCases ; ! Not checked for stem adjustment
+QAQ:%^TRUNC%>qaq IV ;
+IT:%^SCHWADEL%>it IV ;

! This paradigm must be completed


! ============= !
! Oblique cases !
! ============= !

LEXICON ObliqueCases
 ObliqueCases_Sg ;
 ObliqueCases_Du ;
 ObliqueCases_Pl ;

LEXICON ObliqueCases_Sg
+Loc+Sg:%>mi clit_sing ;
+Mod+Sg:%>mik clit_sing ;
+Trm+Sg:%>mun clit_sing ;
+Abl+Sg:%>miñ clit_sing ;
! +Trm+Sg:%^CVCTRUNC%>n%>mun clit ; ! Check, from tp_sing

LEXICON ObliqueCases_Du
+Loc+Du:%>ni clit ;

LEXICON ObliqueCases_Pl
+Loc+Pl:%>ni clit ;
+Trm+Pl:%>nun clit ;

! This paradigm must be completed



! ============================================== !
! Lexica for propernouns, pronouns and particles !
! ============================================== !

! Proper nouns ! Still a dummy
LEXICON propmorph
+N+Prop: clit ; ! Both tags here

! Pronouns ! Still a dummy
LEXICON pronmorph
+Pron: clit ; ! thus no +N tag here

! Particles
LEXICON partmorph
+Part:%>   clit ;
